Utah statutes.
59-10-1305.   Nongame wildlife contribution -- Credit to Wildlife Resources
Account.
(1)  As used in this section, "nongame wildlife" means wildlife species that
are:
(a) (i)  protected;
(ii)  endangered; or
(iii)  threatened with extinction;
(b)  under the jurisdiction of the Division of Wildlife Resources, including:
(i)  aquatic wildlife;
(ii)  a crustacean;
(iii)  an invertebrate;
(iv)  a mollusk; or
(v)  specialized habitat wildlife, including an aquatic or terrestrial type of
specialized habitat wildlife;
(c)  not commonly pursued, killed, or consumed for sport or profit; and
(d)  not nuisance predators presently being brought under control by the
state.
(2)  Except as provided in Section 59-10-1304, a resident or nonresident
individual that files an individual income tax return under this chapter may
designate on the resident or nonresident individual's individual income tax
return a contribution as provided in this part to preserve, protect,
perpetuate, and enhance nongame wildlife resources of the state through
preservation of a satisfactory environment and an ecological balance.
(3)  The commission shall:
(a)  determine annually the total amount of contributions designated in
accordance with this section; and
(b)  credit the amount described in Subsection (3)(a) to the Wildlife
Resources Account in accordance with Section 23-14-13.
